District of Columbia statutes.
16-923

Abolition of action for breach of promise, alienation of affections, and criminal conversation.

Causes of action for breach of promise, alienation of affections, and criminal conversation are hereby abolished.

Apr. 7, 1977, D.C. Law 1-107, title I, § 111(a), 23 DCR 8737
1981 Ed., § 16-923.
1973 Ed., § 16-923.